Hawaii statutes.
§25-5 Compensation. Each of the
members of the reapportionment commission selected and certified shall, for the
period the member holds the member's office, receive compensation of $50 per
meeting but not to exceed $1,000 per month and shall be allowed actual and
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties.
Payments for compensation and expenses shall be paid by warrants signed by the
comptroller upon vouchers properly endorsed by the chairperson of the
commission. The members of the commission shall be exempt from the provisions
of chapter 76. [L 1969, c 79, §5; am L 1973, c 217, §9(a); gen ch 1985, 1993;
am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next